California, session 20252026, AB2737.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 95016 of the Government Code is amended to read:95016. (a) Each infant or toddler referred for evaluation for early intervention services shall have a timely, comprehensive, multidisciplinary evaluation of his or her their needs and level of functioning in order to determine eligibility. In the process of determining eligibility of an infant or toddler, an assessment shall be conducted by qualified personnel, and shall include a family interview, to identify the child’s unique strengths and needs and the services appropriate to meet those needs; and the resources, priorities, and concerns of the family and the supports and services necessary to enhance the family’s capacity to meet the developmental needs of their infant or toddler. Evaluations and assessments shall be shared and utilized between the regional center and the local educational agency, and any other agency providing services for the eligible infant or toddler, as appropriate. Family assessments shall be family directed and voluntary on the part of the family. Families shall be afforded the opportunity to participate in all decisions regarding eligibility and services.(b) Regional centers and local educational agencies or their designees shall be responsible for ensuring that the requirements of this section are implemented. The procedures, requirements, and timelines for evaluation and assessment shall be consistent with the statutes and regulations under Part C of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1431 et seq.), applicable regulations, and this title, and shall be specified in regulations adopted pursuant to Section 95028.